Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. Community College Districts

§ 21-18-301.
Community college district to be body corporate; name.

Each community college district which is formed under this act is a body corporate by the name and style of “ . . . . .
Community College District, State of Wyoming”, the blank space to contain the chosen name of the district, and in that name the district may hold property and be a party to suits and contracts.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 21-494; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

21-3-301

; W.S. 1977, §

21-18-203

; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

21-18-301

was renumbered by Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4, effective July 1, 1985. For present provision, see §

21-18-317

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-18-102(a)(xvi).

§ 21-18-302.
District board generally; quorum; organization; officers.

Within thirty (30) days after the election establishing the community college district and its initial board, and on or about December 1 each year thereafter, the board shall meet and organize by electing one (1) of its members as president, one (1) as treasurer, and one (1) as secretary. The president shall preside at all meetings of the board except that a temporary chairman may be selected by the board in his absence. The secretary shall keep the minutes and proceedings of all board meetings and the treasurer shall receive all funds payable to the district and disburse them on the order of the board.

A majority of the community college district board members constitutes a quorum for the transaction of all business but a minimum of three (3) concurring votes is required to decide any question.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 21-474; Laws 1973, ch. 209, § 1; ch. 251, § 2; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-204; W.S. 1977, §

21-18-204

; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4; 1989, ch. 195, § 1; 2022 ch. 58, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “and its initial board” in the first sentence of (a).

§ 21-18-303.
District board generally; powers; board approved additional mill levy.

The community college district board may:

Sue and be sued in the name by which the district is designated;

Hold and convey property for the benefit of the district in the name by which the district is designated;

Employ legal counsel and bear the cost of litigation;

Construct or otherwise provide bookstores, vehicular parking facilities, recreational, or other facilities necessary and incidental to the community college, and may fix rates and provide for the collection of same;

Issue general obligation bonds for community college purposes as specified in this act;

Issue revenue bonds for the purposes, and in the manner specified in this act;

Establish and collect charges, and rentals and student fees for services and facilities furnished, acquired, constructed, or purchased from the proceeds of revenue bonds;

Charge and collect fees and tuition;

Enter into agreements with any public or private agency, institution, person or corporation for the performance of acts or for the furnishing of services or facilities by or for the community college district or for the joint performance of an act or function or the joint furnishing of services and facilities by the district and the other party to the agreement;

Insure against loss of property or revenue from any cause;

Insure against public liability or property damage concerning the facilities authorized by the governing board, and insure and hold harmless from liability all administrative and teaching personnel, and all other employees of the community college district;

Establish criteria for appointments to fill vacancies in the board not inconsistent with the provisions of this act and provide for the removal of a board member for cause or change of residence;

Call special meetings at the discretion of the board president or a majority of the board without the necessity of publication of formal notice;

Contribute to the financial support of the commission in funding or in-kind services as determined through consultation between the community college boards and the commission;

Employ, at its own discretion, an assistant to the treasurer of the community college district board, who shall be subject to the same bonding and fiduciary regulations as are imposed upon the treasurer and who may be empowered to satisfy debts of the district as they become due and owing;

Confer degrees and certificates, including applied baccalaureate degrees approved by the commission, and grant diplomas as are usual for community colleges and authorized under its accreditation by the regional accrediting agency;

Subject to all applicable laws and rules, determine the qualifications and responsibilities of bidders or respondents on contracts for the construction of public projects, facilities or structures over which the board controls the bidding process, through the use of standard forms and procedures adopted by the board;

Enter into student learner agreements as defined by W.S. 27-14-102(a)(xxxiv) with any employer pursuant to W.S.

27-14-110

.

In addition to the levy imposed under W.S. 21-18-304(a)(vii) and any levy imposed under W.S. 21-18-311(f), the community college district board may approve up to one (1) additional mill levy on the assessed value of the district for a period not to exceed two (2) years for the regular support and operation of the college. A determination by the board shall be made at a regular or special meeting following a public hearing announced by the board. Notice of intent to levy all or a portion of the additional one (1) mill shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the district at least thirty (30) days before the hearing date. Upon approval, the board shall report the additional levy to the board of county commissioners of each county within the district in the same manner the necessary levy under W.S. 21-18-304(a)(vii) is reported. Any tax imposed under this subsection may be renewed by the board for additional two (2) year periods subject to public hearing requirements specified under this section and shall be levied, collected and distributed separate from the tax imposed under W.S. 21-18-304(a)(vii) and any additional levy imposed under W.S. 21-18-311(f). Revenues collected under this subsection shall not be restricted by the commission in any manner but shall be identified in the biennial funding report of the college under W.S. 21-18-205(b).

The community college district board shall procure the professional services of architects, engineers and surveyors in accordance with W.S. 9-23-105(f) through (h) and 9-23-106(g).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 21-475; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-205; W.S. 1977, §

21-18-205

; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4; 1990, ch. 40, § 1; 1991, ch. 197, § 1; 1993, ch. 188, § 1; 2000, ch. 33, § 1; ch. 73, § 1; 2013 ch. 132, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2019 ch. 199, § 1, effective March 15, 2019; 2020 ch. 30, § 1, effective October 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 160, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 199 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2019.

The 2013 amendment,

added (a)(xvii).

Laws 2013, ch. 132, § 2, made the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2013.

The 2019 amendment,

in (a)(xvi), substituted "certificates, including applied baccalaureate degrees approved by the commission, and grant diplomas" for "certificates and grant diplomas."

The 2020 amendment,

effective October 1, 2020, added (c).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(xviii).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 21-18-102(a)(xvi).

§ 21-18-304.
District board generally; duties.

The community college district board shall:

Prescribe and enforce rules and regulations for its own government and for government of the community college under its jurisdiction. Rules and regulations shall not be inconsistent with the rules and regulations of the community college commission;

Prescribe requirements for graduation;

Report annually the revenues and expenses of the community college district in accordance with the rules and regulations of the community college commission;

Submit such reports as the community college commission may require under W.S.

21-18-202

;

Require the treasurer and the assistant treasurer of the district board to give such bond in such penalty and with such sureties as the board shall direct and approve, conditioned upon the faithful application of all money and property which may come into their hands by virtue of their office. Each bond shall not exceed one and one-half (1 1/2) times the amount of all college monies handled by the treasurer or assistant treasurer in any one (1) year. Bonds, after being approved by the board, shall be filed with the board, and no disbursements shall be made until the bonds are approved and filed. In case of breach of conditions of bonds, suit shall be brought thereon by the board for the benefit of the district;

Appoint a chief administrative officer of the community college who shall be given such official title as the board may determine;

At the first meeting of each fiscal year or at any appropriate time, make an estimate of the amount of funds required to be raised through a tax levy upon the property lying within the district for community college purposes, and present to the board of county commissioners of each county included within the district, a certified estimate of the tax required to raise the appropriate amount. The tax in any one (1) year shall not exceed four (4) mills on the assessed value of the district, excluding any tax approved by the board and imposed under W.S. 21-18-303(b) and any tax approved by the district electors and imposed under W.S. 21-18-311(f). The tax shall be levied and collected in the same manner as other county taxes and when collected, the county treasurer shall forward the tax revenue to the treasurer of the community college district board;

Control and disburse, or cause to be disbursed, all monies received from any source to maintain the community college;

Keep a record of all the official acts performed by the board and keep a record of all warrants issued against the monies belonging to the community college district. Payments of money shall be made upon warrant drawn against funds belonging to the community college district and the warrants so drawn must specify upon their face the purposes for which funds are called for by warrants. The board shall provide, at the expense of the district, a seal, upon which shall be engraved the words, “ . . . . . Community College District, State of Wyoming”, the blank space to contain the legal name of the college district. The seal shall be kept in the possession of the secretary, shall be affixed to all communications or notices required by law to be sent or published by the board and to all warrants drawn upon the district;

Conduct elections held by the community college district for the regular election of board members, the issuance of bonds, the questions of mill levies and annexations and any other community college election appropriately within the jurisdiction of the district board, all in accordance with the election procedures set forth in this act;

Develop and maintain a comprehensive plan of district buildings addressing district long-term building needs, clearly distinguishing those building needs associated with education space needs attached to the statewide college system strategic plan developed by the community college commission under W.S.

21-18-202

(a)(v) from other district needs which may be included within the district’s long-term plan. Building plans and capital construction requests shall be submitted to the commission in a form and format specified by commission rule and regulation. In addition, the board shall provide planning, design and other information required by the state construction department under W.S.

21-18-225

(g) and shall cooperate with the department and the commission as necessary to undertake any building construction project receiving state funds and addressing needs prioritized by the commission in accordance with W.S.

21-18-225

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 21-476; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-206; W.S. 1977, §

21-18-206

; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4; 1989, ch. 248, § 2; 1990, ch. 40, § 1; 2000, ch. 73, § 1; 2009, ch. 211, § 2; 2016 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 58, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(xi).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in (a)(xi) substituted “state construction department” for “department of administration and information.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “the regular” in (a)(x).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(x), see § 21-18-102(a)(xvi).

Limited power of board to re-rate teachers. —

When the community college district board has once adopted a policy and, without fraud, error or mistake, rates a teacher under that policy, although the board may later change its policy as to new entrants into the department, it has no power years later to go back and review that teacher's case and to re-rate that teacher retrospectively on the theory that the original rating was too high. Northern Wyo. Community College Dist. v. Nipps, 582 P.2d 83,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 222

(Wyo. 1978).

And limited court review of board's application of regulations. —

The courts may set aside the community college district board's application of regulations only where the board acts arbitrarily or fraudulently, or where there is an illegal exercise of discretion; and the burden of proving such defects is on the complainant. Northern Wyo. Community College Dist. v. Nipps, 582 P.2d 83,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 222

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Long v. Laramie County Community College Dist., 840 F.2d 743, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 2079 (10th Cir. 1988).

§ 21-18-305.
Budget.

The chief administrative officer shall annually cause to be submitted a budget for the approval of the community college district board.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 21-477; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-207; W.S. 1977, §

21-18-207

; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4.

§ 21-18-306.
Bonds of officers and employees.

The community college district may require each officer and employee whose duty it is to handle funds or property of the district to be bonded under a suitable bond indemnifying the district against loss. The board shall determine the amount and the type of the bond.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 21-478; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-208; W.S. 1977, §

21-18-208

; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4.

§ 21-18-307.
Admission of state high school graduates without examination.

A person who graduates from a high school in this state shall be admitted to a community college of this state without further qualifying examination.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 21-479; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-209; W.S. 1977, § 21-18-209; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4.

§ 21-18-308.
Number of board members; election; subdistricts; apportionment.

Each community college district board shall consist of seven (7) members to be elected as provided by law.

The community college district board may by resolution partition the community college district into election subdistricts to provide for representation on the district board in accordance with population. Where population figures permit, monetary evaluation and geographic factors may be considered in determining subdistricts.

The community college district board shall by resolution designate the number of members of the district board which shall be elected from each election subdistrict if any, in accordance with the population of the community college district and the respective election subdistricts.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 21-484; Laws 1974, ch. 8, § 1; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-216; W.S. 1977, §

21-18-216

; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to conducting community college district elections, see §§

22-22-101

to

22-22-304

.

§ 21-18-309.
First regular election of board; fiscal year.

The first regular election of a community college district board shall not be held until the date of the second succeeding general election that follows the election establishing the community college district and its initial board. The terms of the members elected at the first regular election shall begin as provided by W.S. 22-22-102(a) with the four (4) candidates receiving the highest number of votes serving four (4) year terms and the candidates receiving the next three (3) highest number of votes serving two (2) year terms. The fiscal year of each community college district shall begin on July 1 of each year and shall end on June 30 of the following year.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 21-486; Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 2; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-217; W.S. 1977, § 21-18-217; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 2022 ch. 58, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the first sentence, added “district” following “community college,” deleted “following creation of a community college district” preceding “shall not,” substituted “date of the second succeeding general election that follows the election establishing the community college district and its initial board” for “May election date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

of the first fiscal year in which a special mill tax is levied and assessed against the taxable property of the district for the uses and purposes of the district,” and added the second sentence.

§ 21-18-310.
Annexation of additional counties into district; annexation election.

Established community college districts may be enlarged by annexing additional counties as provided in this section. A county may be annexed under this section to an existing community college district with which it is contiguous or any other community college district approved by the community college commission.

Upon receipt of a petition signed by at least ten percent (10%) of the qualified electors residing within the county sought to be annexed requesting that the county be annexed to the community college district or upon receipt of a resolution calling for annexation by the board of county commissioners of the county sought to be annexed, the community college district board shall within ten (10) days following receipt, approve or deny the petition or resolution. If approved, the district board shall request an election to be held in the county seeking annexation in accordance with the dates and procedures provided by W.S.

22-21-103

through

22-21-110

. The number of electors required for a petition shall be determined by the number of votes cast at the last general election.

The community college district board shall pay all costs incident to the election.

The ballot in an election for annexation of any county to an existing community college district shall state the question in substantially the following form:

“Shall . . . . . County, Wyoming be annexed to the established . . . . . Community College District, giving . . . . . Community College District the authority to levy a tax not to exceed four (4) mills on the assessed value of the county and in addition, to impose a levy of . . . . . mills (not to exceed five (5) mills) on the assessed value of the county as previously approved by the district electors and imposed under W.S. 21-18-311(f), all revenues of which shall be used for the operation and maintenance of the Community College located at . . . . . , Wyoming?”

Annexation and mill levy
. . . . .
YES •

Annexation and mill levy
. . . . .
NO •

Only qualified voters residing within the county to be annexed shall be allowed to vote in the election.

If the annexation is approved by the voters of the county to be annexed:

The county clerk shall immediately notify the county commissioners and the county commissioners shall levy the special mill tax in the manner provided by law;

The community college district board shall immediately and by resolution partition the enlarged district into election subdistricts to provide for board representation based upon population and shall designate the number of board members to be elected from each subdistrict in accordance with the population of the enlarged district and the respective election subdistricts. In accordance with W.S. 21-18-308(a), the board of the enlarged district shall be comprised of not more than seven (7) members;

An election of members of the board of trustees of the enlarged community college district shall be held as determined by the board of county commissioners, on a date which is not less than sixty (60) days following the date annexation is approved based upon the apportionment by the board under paragraph (f)(ii) of this section. Nominations to the board of the enlarged district shall be submitted in substantially the same manner as prescribed under W.S. 21-18-312(j) for initial community college district boards and the election shall be otherwise conducted as provided by law. Terms of office of board members filled prior to the date annexation is approved shall expire at 12:00 noon on the first day immediately following the election of board members of the enlarged district. Initial terms of trustees to be elected to the enlarged community college district board shall begin on the first day immediately following the election and shall be for not less than two (2) or not less than four (4) years as determined by the board as necessary to coincide with the terms of office prescribed under W.S.

22-22-102

. Not more than four (4) initial members shall be elected for terms of not less than four (4) years and the board shall designate and report to the appropriate county clerk the length of term for each trustee office to be filled in the election. Thereafter, all terms shall be for four (4) years in accordance with W.S.

22-22-102

;

The community college district board may contract to provide educational programs to the annexed county.

Notwithstanding W.S.

21-18-314

, a majority of the community college district board of an enlarged district may submit the question of issuing general obligation bonds for purposes enumerated under W.S.

21-18-314

(a) to only the electors of the county in which the buildings, facilities or equipment are to be situated or to all electors of the enlarged district. If the bonding question is submitted only to the electors of the county in which the proposed facilities are to be located, the four percent (4%) limitation prescribed under W.S. 21-18-314(a) and the levy for payment of the bonds shall apply only to the assessed value of the voting county. The provisions of W.S. 21-18-314 and

21-18-315

governing general obligation bonds otherwise apply to any bonds issued under this section. A board of an enlarged district shall not use revenues collected under taxes imposed upon any annexed county for purposes of this subsection to pay interest and principal on any bonded indebtedness outstanding on or before the date of annexation.

Annexation approved by the electors in accordance with this section shall remain in effect unless within four (4) years or by the second general election following initial adoption, whichever is later, the proposition is again submitted to and defeated by the electors of the annexed county. The proposition for continuing annexation shall be submitted only at an election held on a date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

upon petition of the electors in the manner prescribed for an initial petition requesting annexation under subsection (b) of this section, except community college district board approval of the petition is not required prior to submission to the electors. If the proposition is submitted to the electors of the annexed county, the ballot shall state the question in substantially the following form:

“Shall . . . . . County, Wyoming, remain annexed to the established . . . . . Community College District, extending . . . . . Community College District authority to levy a tax not to exceed four (4) mills on the assessed value of the county for the operation and maintenance of the Community College located at . . . . . , Wyoming?”

Continued Annexation and Mill Levy
. . . . .
YES •

Continued Annexation and Mill Levy
. . . . .
NO •

If a proposition for continuing annexation under subsection (h) of this section is not approved, the county for which continued annexation is not approved shall be eliminated from the established community college district and:

The county clerk shall immediately notify the county commissioners and the special mill levy imposed upon the assessed value of the county for the operation and maintenance of the community college shall terminate effective the end of that calendar year. This paragraph shall not apply to any levy which may be imposed for the payment of general obligation bonds issued by the enlarged district under subsection (g) of this section;

Any buildings, facilities or equipment of the community college district located within the county eliminated from the district shall remain the property of that district;

Any contract to which the community college district is a party and entered into prior to the defeat of continued annexation shall remain in force and effect for the period provided within the contract. The county commissioners of any county eliminated from the district shall be subject to any liability of the county under the contract;

An election of members of the board of trustees of the reduced district shall be held as determined by the board of county commissioners, on a date which is not less than sixty (60) days following the date continued annexation is defeated. The board of the reduced district shall be comprised of not more than seven (7) members and the election shall be held in accordance with law. Terms of office of board members filled prior to the date continued annexation is defeated shall expire at 12:00 noon of the first day immediately following the election of board members of the reduced district. The initial terms of office of trustees to be elected shall begin on the first day immediately following the election and shall be staggered in the manner prescribed under subsection (f) of this section.

An area smaller than a county cannot be removed from a community college district.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 21-487; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-218; W.S. 1977, § 21-18-218; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4; 1989, ch. 248, § 2; 1990, ch. 40, § 1; 1991, ch. 7, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 2000, ch. 73, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (d)(ii) or (h)(ii) or subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-18-311.
Election for increase of tax mill levy; additional levy in excess of four mills; distribution of additional levy revenues.

In any community college district in which the qualified electors have previously approved the levy of a tax of less than four (4) mills for the operation of a community college, the community college district board may submit to the electors of the community college district the question of increasing the existing tax levy of the district to not to exceed four (4) mills on the dollar of assessed valuation.

Whenever a community college district board resolves to submit the question of increasing the existing tax levy to the electors of the district, the board shall give notice.

An election for increasing the tax levy shall be held on a date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

and otherwise conducted in all respects the same as a board election.

The ballot in the election shall be in substantially the following form:

“Shall the existing mill levy of
. . . . .
mills of the
. . . . .
Community College District be increased to not exceed four (4) mills?”

Four (4) Mills
. . . . .
Yes •

Four (4) Mills
. . . . .
No •

The county clerk shall immediately give notice of the result of the election to the county commissioners of the county or counties involved and if the increase has been authorized by the electors of the district it may be assessed against the taxable property of the community college district in the manner provided by the law.

If the qualified electors of any community college district have previously approved a tax levy of four (4) mills for the regular support and operation of a community college, the community college district board may submit to the electors of the district a proposition calling for an additional levy of not to exceed five (5) mills on the assessed value of the district for community college purposes. For elections held pursuant to this subsection on or after April 1, 2007, the additional mills may be used for the regular support and operation and for the capital outlay needs of a community college as provided under subsection (h) of this section. The proposition shall be submitted at an election held on a date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

. Subsections (b) and (c) of this section apply to any election held under this subsection. At the election, the ballot shall contain the words “for the additional . . . . . mill levy (not to exceed five (5) mills) of the . . . . . Community College District” and “against the additional . . . . . mill levy (not to exceed five (5) mills) of the . . . . . Community College District”. Following the election, each county clerk of the counties involved shall immediately give notice of the election result to the county commissioners and:

If the additional levy is approved by the district electors, each involved board of county commissioners shall levy the additional tax and the same proposition shall be submitted at each second general election following approval of the additional levy until the proposition is defeated. The tax shall be levied and collected separate from the four (4) mill levy imposed under W.S. 21-18-304(a)(vii), and any levy imposed under W.S. 21-18-303(b), and for elections held pursuant to this subsection before April 1, 2007, shall be distributed in accordance with subsection (g) of this section;

If the additional levy is defeated, the proposition shall not again be submitted to the district electors for at least eleven (11) months. If the proposition is defeated at any general election following initial adoption of the additional levy, the additional tax is repealed effective December 31 of that calendar year in which defeated and the levy imposed by the county commissioners for the following calendar year shall not exceed the levy authorized under W.S. 21-18-303(b) and 21-18-304(a)(vii).

The county treasurer shall distribute revenues collected under any additional levy authorized under subsection (f) of this section at an election held before April 1, 2007, to the treasurer of the appropriate community college district board of trustees, who shall deposit the revenue collections as follows:

The total amount collected in a separate account for expenditure by the district in accordance with this paragraph. Revenues deposited pursuant to this paragraph shall be included within the district’s estimated and reportable revenues for purposes of the biennial funding report of the district under W.S. 21-18-205(b) but shall be restricted only as provided in this paragraph. Expenditure by the district of revenues within the account shall be limited to the following:

Covering unanticipated local revenue shortfalls;

Funding expenses incurred by the district due to a significant variation in student full-time equivalency enrollment;

Emergency and preventative maintenance and repair expenses for college physical facilities;

Making payments on district outstanding bonded indebtedness due to an inability to meet scheduled payments; or

Funding specific district program needs.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 95, § 2.

The county treasurer shall distribute revenues collected under any additional levy authorized under subsection (f) of this section at an election held on or after April 1, 2007, to the treasurer of the appropriate community college district board of trustees in the same manner as revenues from the levy imposed under W.S. 21-18-304(a)(vii). Revenues distributed pursuant to this subsection shall be included within the district’s estimated and reportable revenues for purposes of the biennial funding report of the district under W.S. 21-18-205(b) but shall not be restricted by the commission in any manner. The revenues may be used for the regular support and operation of a community college and subject to approval of the commission and legislature pursuant to W.S. 21-18-205(g), for purposes of capital outlay for district capital facility repair, maintenance, construction and renovation needs.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 217, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 21-488; Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21-3-219; W.S. 1977, § 21-18-219; Laws 1985, ch. 208, § 4; 1989, ch. 248, § 2; 1990, ch. 38, § 1; ch. 40, § 1; 1993, ch. 95, §§ 1, 3; 1995, ch. 20, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 2000, ch. 33, § 1; 2007, ch. 46, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

in (f) inserted the second sentence; in (f)(i) inserted “for elections held pursuant to this subsection before April 1, 2007”; in (g) inserted “at an election held before April 1, 2007,” preceding “to the treasurer”; and added (h).

Laws 2007, ch. 46, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2007.